Ohio, session 136, SB330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3321.044 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3321.044. A school district board of education may adopt a policy that permits the district to count a student's mental health day as an excused absence. The policy shall include all of the following: (A) A definition for what qualifies as a mental health day; (B) A limit on the number of mental health days a student may take each school year; (C) A method to determine whether the student will receive or be referred to school health or support services. Section 2. This act shall be known as the Student Wellness Act.